California, session 20252026, AB1605.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25655 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:25655. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, every person who sells, furnishes, gives away, or causes to be sold, furnished, or given away any alcoholic beverage shall request and review a form of written identification issued by this state or another state. bona fide evidence of majority and identity, as described in Section 25660.(b) Notwithstanding Section 25617, a violation of this section is not a crime.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 2. Section 25657.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:25657.5. (a) No person shall sell, furnish, give away, or cause to be sold, furnished, or given away any alcoholic beverage to a person who provides an identification card or driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 13353.9 of the Vehicle Code.(b) Notwithstanding Section 25617, a violation of this section is not a crime. (c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 3. Section 25659 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:25659. (a) For the purpose of preventing the violation of Section 25658, a licensee, or their agent or employee, shall refuse to sell or serve alcoholic beverages to a person who is unable to produce adequate written evidence that the person is over 21 years of age. A licensee, or their agent or employee, may seize any identification presented by a person that shows the person to be under 21 years of age or that is false, so long as a receipt is given to the person from whom the identification is seized and the seized identification is given within 24 hours of seizure to the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the licensed premises. A licensee’s, or their agent’s or employees’, decision to not seize a license shall not create any civil or criminal liability.(b) Notwithstanding Section 25617 and except as provided in Section 25658, a violation of this section is not a crime. (c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 25659 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:25659. (a) For the purpose of preventing the violation of Section 25658, a licensee, or their agent or employee, shall refuse to sell or serve alcoholic beverages to a person who is unable to produce adequate written evidence that the person is over 21 years of age. A licensee, or their agent or employee, may seize any identification presented by a person that shows the person to be under 21 years of age or that is false, so long as a receipt is given to the person from whom the identification is seized and the seized identification is given within 24 hours of seizure to the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the licensed premises. A licensee’s, or their agent’s or employees’, decision to not seize a license shall not create any civil or criminal liability.(b) For the purpose of preventing a violation of Section 25657.5, a licensee of their agent or employee shall refuse to sell or serve alcoholic beverages to a person who provides an identification card or driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 13353.9 of the Vehicle Code.(c) Notwithstanding Section 25617 and except as provided in Section 25658, a violation of this section is not a crime. (d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 5. Section 13353.9 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:13353.9. (a) The department shall issue an identification card or a driver’s license with the words “NO ALCOHOL SALES” or another appropriate designation on the face of the identification card or driver’s license for an individual who has submitted an application and for whom the court department has received an abstract of the record of a court showing that the court has issued orders pursuant to Section 23600.5.(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 6. Section 23600.5 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:23600.5. (a) A court may prohibit a person convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable pursuant to Section 23550 or 23550.5, a violation of Section 23153 punishable pursuant to Section 23550.5 or 23566, or a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code, who is granted probation from purchasing alcohol for a period not exceeding the entire probationary period, as a term and condition of probation.(b) After issuing an order pursuant to this section, the court shall ensure that the physical copies of the person’s driver’s license or identification card are forfeited or surrendered to law enforcement.(c) The court shall impose a fee to cover the costs of the Department of Motor Vehicles in issuing a replacement identification card or driver’s license. An individual with an income of less than 200 percent of the official federal poverty level is eligible to pay this fee on a payment plan.(d) The Judicial Council shall work with the Department of Motor Vehicles regarding the implementation of this section.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.SEC. 7. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.